th: สไตล์ของการทำไอระเหย: แบบตรงเข้าสู่ปอด (DTL); แบบปากเข้าสู่ปอด (MTL); แบบตรงลงปอดที่มีการจำกัด (RDTL); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Model e-cigarete: Izravno u pluća (DTL); Usta u pluća (MTL); Ograničeno izravno u pluća (RDTL); Ostalo
bg-BG: Вейпинг стил: Директно към белия дроб (DTL); От устата към белия дроб (MTL); Ограничено директно към белия дроб (RDTL); Други
fr: Style de vapotage: Directement aux poumons (DTL); Bouche aux poumons (MTL); Directement restreint aux poumons (RDTL); Autre
sl-SI: Slog vejpanja: Neposredno v pljuča (DTL); Od ust do pljuč (MTL); Omejeno neposredno v pljuča (RDTL); Drugo
pl: Styl wapowania: Bezpośrednio do płuc (DTL); Usta do płuc (MTL); Ograniczone bezpośrednie do płuc (RDTL); Inne
sk-SK: Štýl vapovania: Priamo do pľúc (DTL); Ústa-pľúca (MTL); Obmedzený priamy poťah do pľúc (RDTL); Iné
hu: Párologtatástípus: Közvetlenül a tüdőbe (DTL); Szájból tüdőbe (MTL); Korlátozott közvetlen a tüdőbe (RDTL); Egyéb
pt-PT: Estilo de vaporização: Direct-to-lung (DTL); Mouth-to-lung (MTL); Restricted direct-to-lung (RDTL); Outro
nl: Vapestijl: Direct-naar-long (DTL); Mond-naar-long (MTL); Beperkt direct-naar-long (RDTL); Andere
lt-LT: Garinimo stilius: Tiesiai į plaučius (DTL); Iš burnos į plaučius (MTL); Apribota tiesiai į plaučius (RDTL); Kita
sv: Vapingstil: Direct-to-lung (DTL); Mouth-to-lung (MTL); Restricted direct-to-lung (RDTL); Övrigt
it: Stile di svapo: Tiro di polmone (DTL); Tiro di guancia (MTL); Flavour Chasing (RDL); Altro
de: Dampfstil: Direct to Lung (DTL); Mouth to Lung (MTL); Restricted Direct to Lung (RDTL); Sonstiges
nb: Damperstil: Direct-to-lung (DTL); Mouth-to-lung (MTL); Begrenset direct-to-lung (RDTL); Annet
pt-BR: Estilo de vaporizador: Direto para o pulmão (DTL); Boca-pulmão (MTL); Restrito direto ao pulmão (RDTL); Outro
es: Estilo de vapeo: Direct-to-lung (DTL); Mouth-to-lung (MTL); Restricted direct-to-lung (RDTL); Otros
vi: Dạng hít khói: Trực tiếp vào phổi (DTL); Hút từ miệng vào phổi (MTL); Hạn chế trực tiếp vào phổi (RDTL); Khác
zh-TW: 電子煙樣式: 肺吸 (DTL); 口吸 (MTL); 限制性口吸 (RDTL); 其他
cs: Způsob vapování: DTL (Direct To Lung); MTL (Mouth To Lung); RDTL (Restricted Direct To Lung); Jiné
ja: ベイプスタイル: ダイレクト・トゥ・ラング (DTL); マウス・トゥ・ラング (MTL); 制限付きダイレクト・トゥ・ラング (RDTL); その他
tr: Elektronik sigara içme stili: Direct-to-lung (Doğrudan akciğere, DTL); Mouth-to-lung (Ağızdan akciğere, MTL); Restricted direct-to-lung (Kısıtla doğrudan akciğere, RDTL); Diğer
en: Vaping style: Direct-to-lung (DTL); Mouth-to-lung (MTL); Restricted direct-to-lung (RDTL); Other
fi: Höyrystystyyli: Suoraan keuhkoihin (DTL); Suusta keuhkoihin (MTL); Rajoitettu suoraan keuhkoihin (RDTL); Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de vaping: Direct la plămâni (DTL); Gură la plămân (MTL); Restricționat direct la plămâni (RDTL); Altele
zh-CN: 电子烟款式: 肺吸模式 (DTL); 口吸模式 (MTL); 限制肺吸模式 (RDTL); 其他
ru: Техника парения: Прямо в легкие (DTL); Изо рта в легкие (MTL); Ограниченная прямая трансфузия в легкие (RDTL); Другое
da: Dampstil: Direkte-til-lunge (DTL); Mund-til-lunge (MTL); Begrænset direkte-til-lunge (RDTL); Andet
ko: 기화 스타일: 폐에 직접 연결(DTL); 입에서 폐로(MTL); 제한된 RDTL(RDTL); 기타
el: Στυλ ατμίσματος: Απευθείας στον πνεύμονα (DTL); Από στόμα σε πνεύμονα (MTL); Περιορισμένη άμεση πρόσβαση στον πνεύμονα (RDTL); Άλλο